src/fst/affixes/quantifiers.lexc
!! Quantifier inflection
!  ---------------
!! Livvi quantifiers inflect for case.

LEXICON NUM_
+TYÄ: # ;

LEXICON NUM-STEMS
#yksi:#y%{front%} NUM_YKSI ;
#kaksi:#ka%{back%} NUM_KAKSI ;
#kolme:#kolm%{back%} NUM_KOLME ;
#nelli:#nell%{front%} NUM_NELLI ;
#viizi:#viid%{front%} NUM_VIIZI ;
#kuuzi:#kuud%{back%} NUM_KUUZI ;
#seiččie:#seičče%{front%} NUM_SEIČČIE ;
#kaheksa:#kaheksa%{back%} NUM_KAHEKSA ;
#yheksä:#yheksä%{front%} NUM_YHEKSÄ ;

LEXICON NUM_OZA
+Card:%{back%} NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ ;
:%{back%} ORD_01_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_MUARJU  !!≈ **@CODE@** muarju:muarja
+Card:%{back%} NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY ;
:%{back%} ORD_01_BACK ;

!LEXICON NUM_SÄYNÄ
!+Card:%{front%} NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ ;

LEXICON NUM_SADA
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%{back%}%^WGStem00 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%{back%}00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%{back%}%^WGStem0 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%{back%}00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;

LEXICON NUM_YKSI  !!≈ @CODE@ yksi:y
+Card: NMN_YKSI ;

LEXICON NUM_KAKSI  !!≈ @CODE@ kaksi:ka
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ksi NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@h00 NUM-SG-PAR_tu ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@hte NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@hte NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@htet NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksi NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksi NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksi NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksi NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
:hte%^WGStem ORD_01_BACK ; !!≈ * @CODE@ This cannot be final
 
LEXICON NUM_SEIČČIE  !!≈ @CODE@ seiččie:seičče
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>e0 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%^WGStemn0 NUM-SG-PAR_dy ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@me NUM-SG-GEN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@me0 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@me0 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@met NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@mi0 NUM-PL-GEN_N ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@mii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@mi0 NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@mi0 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@mi0 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
:mä ORD_01_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_NELLI !!≈ @CODE@ nelli:nell
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@i00 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>i0 NUM-SG-PAR_ä ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>ä NUM-SG-GEN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{aä%}0 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>%{aä%}0 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>%{aä%}t NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ii0 NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
:ä ORD_01_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KAHEKSA !!≈ @CODE@ kaheksa:kaheksa
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@000 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@000 NUM-SG-PAR_a ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@000 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@000 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@t00 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>i0 NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>ii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>i0 NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>i0 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>i0 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
: ORD_01_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_YHEKSÄ !!≈ @CODE@ yheksä:yheksä
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@000 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@000 NUM-SG-PAR_ä ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@000 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@000 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@t00 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>i0 NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>ii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>i0 NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>i0 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%>i0 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
: ORD_01_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_TUHAT !!≈ @CODE@ tuhat:tuha
:%{back%} NUM_TUHAT_01 ;
LEXICON NUM_TUHAT_01 !!≈ @CODE@ tuhat:tuha
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@t00 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@t00 NUM-SG-PAR_tu ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ndet NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
:nde ORD_01_BACK ;

!LEXICON NUM_KARJALAINE !!≈ @CODE@ 
!+Qnt:%{back%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE ;
